New York, session 2025-2026, S6508.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 803-c 2 to read as follows: 3 § 803-c. Courses of study in awareness and prevention of human traf- 4 ficking. 1. All pupils in grades K-12 in all public schools in the state 5 shall receive instruction designed to educate, empower and warn students 6 about the signs of human trafficking. Such program shall be defined by 7 the commissioner in regulations after consultation with the division of 8 criminal justice services and be designed to educate students, parents 9 and school personnel about the signs of human trafficking. Such program 10 shall include, but not be limited to students and parents. Nothing in 11 this section shall prevent the department from making model curriculum 12 and resource materials available on the department's website. 13 2. The commissioner may provide technical assistance to assist in the 14 development of curricula for such courses of study which shall be age 15 appropriate and developed according to the needs and abilities of pupils 16 at successive grade levels in order to provide awareness, skills, infor- 17 mation, self-confidence and support to aid in the prevention of human 18 trafficking. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 20 the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the 21 addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary 22 for the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized 23 to be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10950-01-5